Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4275.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "mineral rights protection act." Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Disqualified person" means any of the following: (i) A foreign entity of concern. (ii) An entity created or organized in or controlled by 1 or more countries that are foreign entities of concern. (iii) An entity controlled by 1 or more disqualified persons under subparagraph (ii). (iv) A citizen of a country that is a foreign entity of concern. (b) "Foreign entity of concern" means that term as defined in 42 USC 18741. (c) "Mineral rights" means the ownership rights related to the extraction minerals. (d) "Minerals" means subsurface oil, gas, coal, or other nonmetallic, or metallic, minerals. Sec. 5. A disqualified entity shall not acquire directly or indirectly, any mineral rights within this state after the effective date of this act. Sec. 7. (1) A person who violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000,000.00. (2) Mineral rights acquired in violation of this act are subject to seizure and forfeiture in the manner provided in chapter 47 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 306, MCL 600.4701 to 600.4710. (3) A violation of this act may be prosecuted by the attorney general. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4274 (request no. H02055'25 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.